North Carolina statutes. Chapter 95. Department of Labor and Labor Regulations.
Article 3. Various Regulations.

§ 95-26.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 56.

§ 95-27.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 660, s. 3.

§ 95-28.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-443, s. 19.14.

§ 95-28.1.
Discrimination against any person possessing sickle cell trait or hemoglobin C trait prohibited.

No person, firm, corporation, unincorporated association, State agency, unit of local government or any public or private entity shall deny or refuse employment to any person or discharge any person from employment on account of the fact such person possesses sickle cell trait or hemoglobin C trait. The term “sickle cell trait” is defined as the condition wherein the major natural hemoglobin components present in the blood of the individual are hemoglobin A (normal) and hemoglobin S (sickle hemoglobin) as defined by standard chemical and physical analytic techniques, including electrophoresis; and the proportion of hemoglobin A is greater than the proportion of hemoglobin S or one natural parent of the individual is shown to have only normal hemoglobin components (hemoglobin A, hemoglobin A2, hemoglobin F) in the normal proportions by standard chemical and physical analytic tests. The term “hemoglobin C trait” is defined as the condition wherein the major natural hemoglobin components present in the blood of the individual are hemoglobin A (normal) and hemoglobin C as defined by standard chemical and physical analytic techniques, including electrophoresis; and the proportion of hemoglobin A is greater than the proportion of hemoglobin C or one natural parent of the individual is shown to have only normal hemoglobin components (hemoglobin A, hemoglobin A2, hemoglobin F) in the normal proportions by standard chemical and physical analytic tests, provided, however, that this section shall not be construed to give employment, promotion, or layoff preference to persons who possess the above traits, or to prevent such persons being discharged for cause.

History.

1975, c. 463, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “North Carolina Employment Law After
Coman
: Reaffirming Basic Rights in the Workplace,” see 24 Wake Forest L. Rev. 905 (1989).

§ 95-28.1A.
Discrimination against persons based on genetic testing or genetic information prohibited.

No person, firm, corporation, unincorporated association, State agency, unit of local government, or any public or private entity shall deny or refuse employment to any person or discharge any person from employment on account of the person’s having requested genetic testing or counseling services, or on the basis of genetic information obtained concerning the person or a member of the person’s family. This section shall not be construed to prevent the person from being discharged for cause.

As used in this section, the term “genetic test” means a test for determining the presence or absence of genetic characteristics in an individual or a member of the individual’s family in order to diagnose a genetic condition or characteristic or ascertain susceptibility to a genetic condition. The term “genetic characteristic” means any scientifically or medically identifiable genes or chromosomes, or alterations or products thereof, which are known individually or in combination with other characteristics to be a cause of a disease or disorder, or determined to be associated with a statistically increased risk of development of a disease or disorder, and which are asymptomatic of any disease or disorder. The term “genetic information” means information about genes, gene products, or inherited characteristics that may derive from an individual or a family member.

History.

1997-350, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “‘Hair’ Today, Gone Tomorrow: How Immutable Traits May Become the New Face of Discrimination as Interpreted in Equal Employment Opportunity Comm’n v. Catastrophe Mgmt. Sols.,” see 39 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 166 (2017).

§ 95-28.2.
Discrimination against persons for lawful use of lawful products during nonworking hours prohibited.

As used in this section, “employer” means the State and all political subdivisions of the State, public and quasi-public corporations, boards, bureaus, commissions, councils, and private employers with three or more regularly employed employees.

It is an unlawful employment practice for an employer to fail or refuse to hire a prospective employee, or discharge or otherwise discriminate against any employee with respect to compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment because the prospective employee or the employee engages in or has engaged in the lawful use of lawful products if the activity occurs off the premises of the employer during nonworking hours and does not adversely affect the employee’s job performance or the person’s ability to properly fulfill the responsibilities of the position in question or the safety of other employees.

It is not a violation of this section for an employer to do any of the following:

Restrict the lawful use of lawful products by employees during nonworking hours if the restriction relates to a bona fide occupational requirement and is reasonably related to the employment activities. If the restriction reasonably relates to only a particular employee or group of employees, then the restriction may only lawfully apply to them.

Restrict the lawful use of lawful products by employees during nonworking hours if the restriction relates to the fundamental objectives of the organization.

Discharge, discipline, or take any action against an employee because of the employee’s failure to comply with the requirements of the employer’s substance abuse prevention program or the recommendations of substance abuse prevention counselors employed or retained by the employer.

This section shall not prohibit an employer from offering, imposing, or having in effect a health, disability, or life insurance policy distinguishing between employees for the type or price of coverage based on the use or nonuse of lawful products if each of the following is met:

Differential rates assessed employees reflect actuarially justified differences in the provision of employee benefits.

The employer provides written notice to employees setting forth the differential rates imposed by insurance carriers.

The employer contributes an equal amount to the insurance carrier on behalf of each employee of the employer.

An employee who is discharged or otherwise discriminated against, or a prospective employee who is denied employment in violation of this section, may bring a civil action within one year from the date of the alleged violation against the employer who violates the provisions of subsection (b) of this section and obtain any of the following:

Any wages or benefits lost as a result of the violation;

An order of reinstatement without loss of position, seniority, or benefits; or

An order directing the employer to offer employment to the prospective employee.

The court may award reasonable costs, including court costs and attorneys’ fees, to the prevailing party in an action brought pursuant to this section.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1023, s. 1.

§ 95-28.3.
Leave for parent involvement in schools.

It is the belief of the General Assembly that parent involvement is an essential component of school success and positive student outcomes. Therefore, employers shall grant four hours per year leave to any employee who is a parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis of a school-aged child so that the employee may attend or otherwise be involved at that child’s school. However, any leave under this section is subject to the following conditions:

The leave shall be at a mutually agreed upon time between the employer and the employee.

The employer may require an employee to provide the employer with a written request for the leave at least 48 hours before the time desired for the leave.

The employer may require that the employee furnish written verification from the child’s school that the employee attended or was otherwise involved at that school during the time of the leave.For the purpose of this section, “school” means any (i) public school, (ii) private church school, church of religious charter, or nonpublic school described in Parts 1 and 2 of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes that regularly provides a course of grade school instruction, (iii) preschool, and (iv) child care facility as defined in

G.S. 110-86(3)

.

Employers shall not discharge, demote, or otherwise take an adverse employment action against an employee who requests or takes leave under this section. Nothing in this section shall require an employer to pay an employee for leave taken under this section.

An employee who is demoted or discharged or who has had an adverse employment action taken against him or her in violation of this section may bring a civil action within one year from the date of the alleged violation against the employer who violates this section and obtain either of the following:

Any wages or benefits lost as a result of the violation; or

An order of reinstatement without loss of position, seniority, wages, or benefits.The burden of proof shall be upon the employee.

History.

1993, c. 509, s. 1; 1997-506, s. 34.

§ 95-28.4.
Veterans preference.

A private, nonpublic employer in the State may provide a preference to a veteran for employment. Spouses of honorably discharged veterans who have a service-connected permanent and total disability also may be preferred for employment. Granting of this preference is not a violation of any State or local equal employment opportunity law.

History.

2013-413, s. 14; 2014-115, s. 17.

§ 95-29.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 660, s. 4.

§ 95-30.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 240.

§ 95-31.
Acceptance by employer of assignment of wages.

No employer of labor shall be responsible for any assignment of wages to be earned in the future, executed by an employee, unless and until such assignment of wages is accepted by the employer in a written agreement to pay same.

History.

1935, c. 410; 1937, c. 90.